Washington statutes.
RCW 18.16.290

License—Inactive status.

(1) If the holder of an individual license in good standing submits a written and notarized request that the licensee's cosmetology, hair design, barber, manicurist, esthetician and master esthetician, or instructor license be placed on inactive status, together with a fee equivalent to that established by rule for a duplicate license, the department shall place the license on inactive status until the expiration date of the license. If the date of the request is no more than six months before the expiration date of the license, a request for a two-year extension of the inactive status, as provided under subsection (2) of this section, may be submitted at the same time as the request under this subsection.

(2) If the holder of a license placed on inactive status under this section submits, by the expiration date of the license, a written and notarized request to extend that status for an additional two years, the department shall, without additional fee, extend the expiration date of: (a) The licensee's individual license; and (b) the inactive status for two years from the expiration date of the license.

(3) A license placed on inactive status under this section may not be extended more frequently than once in any twenty-four month period or for more than six consecutive years.

(4) If, by the expiration date of a license placed on inactive status under this section, a licensee is unable, or fails, to request that the status be extended and the license is not renewed, the license shall be canceled.

[ 2015 c 62 s 11; 2013 c 187 s 12; 2004 c 51 s 2.]

NOTES:

Notice of chapter 51, Laws of 2004—Effective date—2004 c 51: See notes following RCW 18.16.060.